src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON REFL_AS-01
+Sg1:с PRON-REFL-SG1-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Sg2:с PRON-REFL-SG2-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Sg3:с PRON-REFL-SG3-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Pl1:с PRON-REFL-PL1-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Pl2:с PRON-REFL-PL2-4-OBL-CASES ;
+Pl3:с PRON-REFL-PL3-4-OBL-CASES ;
:с PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES ;

+Sg1:слам PRON-REFL-SG1-4-GEN  "minun oma -ni" ;
+Sg1:чым PRON-REFL-SG1-4-NOM  "minä itse" ;

+Sg2:сьтӧ PRON-REFL-SG2-4-ACC  "" ;
+Sg2:слад PRON-REFL-SG2-4-GEN  "sinun oma -si" ;
+Sg2:чыд PRON-REFL-SG2-4-CAR/ELA/NOM  "sinä itse" ;
+Sg3:сьсӧ PRON-REFL-SG3-4-ACC  "" ;
+Sg3:слас PRON-REFL-SG3-4-GEN  "hänen oma -nsa/ sen oma" ;
+Sg3:чыс PRON-REFL-SG3-4-NOM  "hän itse" ;

+Pl1:сланым PRON-REFL-PL1-4-GEN  "meidän oma -mme" ;
+Pl1:сьным PRON-REFL-PL1-4-NOM  "me itse" ;
+Pl2:сь PRON-REFL-PL2-4-ACC  "" ;
+Pl2:сланыд PRON-REFL-PL2-4-GEN  "teidän oma -nne" ;
+Pl2:сьныд PRON-REFL-PL2-4-NOM  "te itse" ;

+Pl3:сь PRON-REFL-PL3-4-ACC  "" ;
+Pl3:сланыс PRON-REFL-PL3-4-GEN  "heidän oma -nsa/ niiden oma" ;
+Pl3:сьныс PRON-REFL-PL3-4-NOM  "he/ ne itse" ;

:сладор PRON-REFL-IN_LADOR  "" ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧг K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Com:кӧд K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Cns:ла K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Dat:лым K ;
+Ela:сьым K ;
+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Pl3
+Ins:намӧн K ; !CHECKME

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгыд K ; !
+Com:кӧдыд K ; !
+Cns:лаыд K ;
+Cns:ыдла K ;
+Dat:лыд K ;
+Ela:сьыд K ;
+Ine:ад K ;
+Ins:над K ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгыс K ; !
+Com:кӧдыс K ; !
+Cns:ысла K ;
+Dat:лыс K ;
+Ela:сьыс K ;
+Ine:ас K ;
+Ins:нас K ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгным K ; !
+Com:кӧдным K ; !
+Dat:лыным K ;
+Ela:сьыным K ;
+Ela:сьынымлысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ela:сьынымысь K ; !CHECKME
+Ins:наным K ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгныд K ; !
+Car:ныдтӧг K ; !
+Cns:ныдла K ;
+Com:кӧдныд K ; !
+Com:ныдкӧд K ; !
+Dat:лыныд K ;
+Dat:лыныдлы K ;
+Ela:сьыныд K ;
+Ins:наныд K ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-OBL-CASES
+Car:тӧгныс K ; !
+Car:ныстӧг K ; !
+Cns:нысла K ;
+Com:кӧдныс K ; !
+Com:ныскӧд K ; !
+Dat:лыныс K ;
+Dat:лыныслы K ;
+Dat:ныслы K ;
+Ela:сьыныс K ;
+Ins:ӧн K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1, Pl3
+Ins:наныс K ;


LEXICON PRON-REFL-OBL-CASES
+Ine+PxPl1:аным K ;
+Ine+PxPl2:аныд K ;
+Ine+PxPl3:аныс K ;
+Sg1+Ill:ӧ K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ill+PxSg1:ам K ; !Ӧнія коми кыв gives this for illative only
+Ill+PxSg2:ад K ; !
+Ill+PxSg3:ас K ; !
+Ill+PxPl1:аным K ; !
+Ill+PxPl2:аныд K ; !
+Ill+PxPl3:аныс K ; !
+Apr+PxSg1:лань K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Apr+PxSg2:ланьыд K ;
+Apr+PxSg3:ланьыс K ;
+Apr+PxPl1:ланьным K ;
+Apr+PxPl2:ланьныд K ;
+Apr+PxPl3:ланьныс K ;
+Egr+PxSg1:сянь K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Egr+PxSg2:сяньыд K ;
+Egr+PxSg3:сяньыс K ;
+Egr+PxPl1:сяньным K ;
+Egr+PxPl2:сяньныд K ;
+Egr+PxPl3:сяньныс K ;
+Tra+PxSg1:ті K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Tra+PxSg2:тіыд K ;
+Tra+PxSg3:тіыс K ;
! Pl1 and Pl2 are not attested in Ӧнія коми кыв
+Tra+PxPl3:тіныс K ;
+Ter+PxSg1:ӧдз K ; !There is no indication of person. = Sg1
+Ter+PxSg2:ӧдзыд K ;
+Ter+PxSg3:ӧдзыс K ;
+Ter+PxPl1:нымӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl2:ныдӧдз K ;
+Ter+PxPl3:нысӧдз K ;
!Extras 2011-10-07


LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-4-NOM
 ACC-WORD-END ;
 CAR-WORD-END ;
 COM-WORD-END ;
 ELA-WORD-END ;
 ILL-WORD-END ;
 INE-WORD-END ;
 INS-WORD-END ;
 NOM-WORD-END ;


LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG1-4-GEN
+Gen: WordEnd ; !! This is bare
 COM-WORD-END ;
 EGR-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-CAR/ELA/NOM
 CAR-WORD-END ;
 NOM-WORD-END ;
 ELA-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-GEN
+Gen: WordEnd ;
 EGR-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG2-4-ACC
+Acc2: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-NOM
 CAR-WORD-END ;
 COM-WORD-END ;
 ELA-WORD-END ;
 NOM-WORD-END ;
 INS-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-GEN
+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
 GEN-WORD-END ;
 ILL-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-SG3-4-ACC
+Acc3: WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-4-NOM
+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
 CAR-WORD-END ;
 COM-WORD-END ;
 ELA-WORD-END ;
 NOM-WORD-END ;
 TER-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL1-4-GEN
+Gen: WordEnd ;  !! bare
 ABL-WORD-END ;
+Der+Der/ладор:%>ладор Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-NOM
+Acc2:тӧ WordEnd ;
 CAR-WORD-END ;
 CNS-WORD-END ;
 ELA-WORD-END ;
 NOM-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-GEN
+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
+Der+Der/ладор:%>ладор Noun1 ;


LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL2-4-ACC
+Acc2:нытӧ WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-NOM
 CNS-WORD-END ;
 NOM-WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-GEN
+Gen: WordEnd ; !! bare
 GEN-WORD-END ;
 PRL-WORD-END ;
+Der+Der/ладор:%>ладор Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRON-REFL-PL3-4-ACC
+Acc3:нысӧ WordEnd ;


LEXICON PRONDEMTAG
+Pron+Dem: WordEnd ; ! sg/pl?

LEXICON ADNDEMTAG
+Det+Dem: K ;
+Det+Dem+Pred+Pl:%>ӧсь K ;
+Det+Dem: Noun1 ;
!+Adn+Dem: K ;
!+Adn+Dem+Pred+Pl:%>ӧсь K ;
!+Adn+Dem+Der/MWN: Noun1 ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-ES
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:%>ійӧ K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc:%>ійӧс K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ins:%>ійӧн K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg:%>ы PRONDEMTAGSG ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>ійӧяс WordEnd ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>ійяс WordEnd ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>ійӧян WordEnd ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>ійян WordEnd ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAGSG-TA
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom:%>йӧ K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc:%>йӧс K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ins:%>йӧн K ;
+Pron+Dem+Sg: PRONDEMTAGSG ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>йӧяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>йяс PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>йӧян PRONDEMTAGPL ;
+Pron+Dem+Pl:%>йян PRONDEMTAGPL ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAGSG 
+Cmpl: WordEnd ;
+Ins:ӧн K ;
+Com:кӧд K ;
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Cns:ла K ;
+Dat:лы K ;
+Ine:ын K ;
+Ela:ысь K ; 
+Ill:ӧ K ; !This is questioned in the 2000 Grammar
+Abl:лысь K ; !
 PRONDEMTAG-APR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-EGR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-PRL ;
 PRONDEMTAG-TRA ;
 PRONDEMTAG-TER ;


LEXICON PRONDEMTAGPL
!+Pron+Dem+Pl: WordEnd ;
+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Gen:лӧн WordEnd ;
+Acc:ӧс WordEnd ;
+Ins:ӧн K ;
+Com:кӧд K ;
+Car:тӧг K ;
+Cns:ла K ;
+Ine:ын K ;
+Ela:ысь K ; 
+Ill:ӧ K ; !
+Abl:лысь K ; !
 PRONDEMTAG-APR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR-EGR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR-ELA ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR-ILL ;
 PRONDEMTAG-APR-INE ;
 PRONDEMTAG-EGR ;
 PRONDEMTAG-PRL ;
 PRONDEMTAG-TRA ;
 PRONDEMTAG-TER ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-ELA
+Ela:ысь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR
+Apr:лань K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-EGR
+AprEgr:ланьсянь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-ELA
+AprEla:ланьысь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-ILL
+AprIll:ланьӧ K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-APR-INE
+AprIne:ланьын K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-EGR
+Egr:сянь K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-PRL
+Prl:ӧд K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-TRA
+Tra:ті K ;

LEXICON PRONDEMTAG-TER
+Ter:ӧдз K ;

! Word forms that already have their morphology 
LEXICON PRON-DEM-IS_INE
+Pron+Dem+Ine: K ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-IS_ILL
+Pron+Dem+Ill: K ;



!2018-10-21!LEXICON PRON-INTER-NONHUM
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Nom: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Gen:лӧн K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Abl:лысь K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Dat:лы K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+ZeroAcc: WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Acc3:сӧ WordEnd ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ins:ӧн K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Com:кӧд K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Car:тӧг K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Cns:ла K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ine:ын K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ela:ысь K ; 
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ill:ӧ K ; !
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Apr:лань K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Egr:сянь K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Prl:ӧд K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Tra:ті K ;
!2018-10-21!+Pron+Interr+Ter:ӧдз K ;

LEXICON PRON-NEG-HUM
+Pron+Neg+Sg+Nom: WordEnd ;
+Pron+Neg+Sg: PRON-NEG-OBL ;
