src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns
мӧд:мӧд PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
некин:некин PRON-NEG-HUM  "" ;
некод:некод PRON-NEG-HUM  "ei kukaan" ;
сэтшӧм:сэтшӧм ADNDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧм-татшӧм:сэтшӧм-татшӧм PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧма:сэтшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтшӧмтӧ:сэтшӧмтӧ PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сэтысь:сэтысь PRONDEMTAG-ELA  "" ;
сэтысянь:сэтысянь PRONDEMTAG-EGR  "" ;
сэтӧні:сэтӧні PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
сійӧ:сы PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
тайӧ:та PRONDEMTAGSG-TA  "tuo" ;
татшӧм:татшӧм ADNDEMTAG  "" ;
татӧні:татӧні PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
таян:таян PRONDEMTAGPL  "" ;
эстшӧм:эстшӧм PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эстшӧма:эстшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эстысь:эстысь PRONDEMTAG-ELA  "" ;
эстысянь:эстысянь PRONDEMTAG-EGR  "" ;
эсы:эсы PRONDEMTAG  "tuo" ;
эсыладор:эсыладор PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсылань:эсылань PRONDEMTAG-APR  "" ;
эсыметь:эсыметь PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсымында:эсымында PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
эсійӧ:эс PRONDEMTAG-ES  "tuo" ;
эсіян:эсіян PRONDEMTAGPL  "" ;
этадз:этадз PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этадзи:этадзи PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этайӧ:эта PRONDEMTAGSG-TA  "juuri tämä" ;
эталань:эталань PRONDEMTAG-APR  "" ;
эталаньсянь:эталаньсянь PRONDEMTAG-APR-EGR  "" ;
эталаньысь:эталаньысь PRONDEMTAG-APR-ELA  "" ;
эталаньӧ:эталаньӧ PRONDEMTAG-APR-ILL  "" ;
этан:этан PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этані:этані PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатшӧм:этатшӧм PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатшӧма:этатшӧма PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
этатысь:этатысь PRONDEMTAG-ELA  "" ;
этатысянь:этатысянь PRONDEMTAG-EGR  "" ;
этійӧ:этійӧ PRONDEMTAG  "juuri tämä" ;
этійӧ:этійӧ PRONDEMTAG  "" ;
